apertium-en-lv.lv.dix
    <pardef n="div/i__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iem</l>
          <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ām</l>
          <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ās</l>
          <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Boeing__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="m"/><s n="indecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Hugo__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="indecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nekur/š__prn_neg">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>š<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>š<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>š<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ā</l>
          <r>š<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>š</l>
          <r>š<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>š<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iem</l>
          <r>š<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>š<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>š<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>š<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>š<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r>š<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>š<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ā</l>
          <r>š<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>š<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>š<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ām</l>
          <r>š<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>š<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ās</l>
          <r>š<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>š<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kād/s__prn_itg">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ā</l>
          <r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iem</l>
          <r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ā</l>
          <r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ām</l>
          <r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ās</l>
          <r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="nekurš"><i>nekur</i><par n="nekur/š__prn_neg"/></e>
    <e lm="kāds"><i>kād</i><par n="kād/s__prn_itg"/></e>
    <e lm="divi"><i>div</i><par n="div/i__num"/></e>
    <e lm="četri"><i>četr</i><par n="div/i__num"/></e>
    <e lm="pieci"><i>piec</i><par n="div/i__num"/></e>
    <e lm="seši"><i>seš</i><par n="div/i__num"/></e>
    <e lm="septiņi"><i>septiņ</i><par n="div/i__num"/></e>
    <e lm="astoņi"><i>astoņ</i><par n="div/i__num"/></e>
    <e lm="deviņi"><i>deviņ</i><par n="div/i__num"/></e>
    <e lm="Boeing"><i>Boeing</i><par n="Boeing__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ford"><i>Ford</i><par n="Boeing__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Skonto"><i>Skonto</i><par n="Boeing__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Hugo"><i>Hugo</i><par n="Hugo__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Galileo"><i>Galileo</i><par n="Hugo__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Leonardo"><i>Leonardo</i><par n="Hugo__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Oto"><i>Oto</i><par n="Hugo__np"/></e>
